Utah statutes.
63G-6-209.   Procurement Advisory Council.
(1)  The policy board may establish a Procurement Advisory Council, which
shall meet at least once a year for the discussion of problems and
recommendations for improvement of the procurement process.  When requested by
the policy board, the Procurement Advisory Council may conduct studies,
research, analyses, and make reports and recommendations with respect to
subjects or matters within the jurisdiction of the policy board.  The
Procurement Advisory Council shall consist of representatives of state and
local government and any other persons the policy board considers desirable.
(2)  The chief procurement officer may appoint advisory groups to provide
advice regarding any matters within the authority of the chief procurement
officer.
(3)  Members of the Procurement Advisory Council and other advisory groups may
be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties, as
provided by the policy board.
